Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Article 3. Commissioner of Public Safety.

Administrative Code. —

For civilian process servers, see 13 AAC 67.

Sec. 22.20.100.
Duty of the commissioner in the supreme court.

The commissioner is the executive officer of the supreme court and shall serve and execute all process issued by the supreme court or a justice of the supreme court, and shall attend the supreme court, and has the authority necessary for the execution of these duties.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 71 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For civilian process server application and licensing requirements, see 13 AAC 67, art. 1.

For examination procedures, see 13 AAC 67, art. 2.

For standards of professional conduct, see 13 AAC 67, art. 3.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 13 AAC 67, art. 4.

For administrative hearings, see 13 AAC 67, art. 5.

For state employees as process servers, see 13 AAC 67, art. 6.

Sec. 22.20.110.
Duty of the commissioner in the court of appeals, the superior court, and district courts.

When required by the supreme court, and except as otherwise provided in AS

18.66.160

, the commissioner shall serve and execute all process issued by the court of appeals, the superior court, and the district courts; attend to and wait upon grand and petit juries; maintain order; attend the sessions of the courts; and exercise the power and perform the duties concerning all matters within the jurisdiction of the courts as may be assigned. The commissioner is the executive officer of the court of appeals, the superior court, and district courts.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 12 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1986; am § 37 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For civilian process server application and licensing requirements, see 13 AAC 67, art. 1.

For examination procedures, see 13 AAC 67, art. 2.

For standards of professional conduct, see 13 AAC 67, art. 3.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 13 AAC 67, art. 4.

For administrative hearings, see 13 AAC 67, art. 5.

For state employees as process servers, see 13 AAC 67, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 19, 2018, added (s).

Sec. 22.20.120.
General authority and duty of the commissioner.

The authority necessary for the lawful performance of the duties of execution of service of process, seizure and detention of property, the sale of property forfeited or levied upon, and arrest of persons, in connection with civil matters, is vested in the commissioner.
Any court of the state issuing any process may direct the process for execution of service to the commissioner or the designee of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 71 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For civilian process server application and licensing requirements, see 13 AAC 67, art. 1.

For examination procedures, see 13 AAC 67, art. 2.

For standards of professional conduct, see 13 AAC 67, art. 3.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 13 AAC 67, art. 4.

For administrative hearings, see 13 AAC 67, art. 5.

For state employees as process servers, see 13 AAC 67, art. 6.

Sec. 22.20.130.
Assistance for commissioner.

The commissioner shall be assisted in the execution of the authority and duty vested by AS

22.20.100

—

22.20.140

by members of the division of state troopers or Alaska state constabulary who the commissioner designates. The commissioner is responsible on official bond for the acts of all persons designated under this subsection. The persons designated under this subsection have the same authority and duty granted to the commissioner and are subject to orders of the courts of the state in the same manner as the commissioner. They are responsible to the commissioner and to the courts, and shall be executive officers of the courts. In order to be designated under this section, the commissioner may require the person to submit the person’s fingerprints and the fees required under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. The commissioner may obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

.

The commissioner has the responsibility of providing sufficient personnel to effectively execute the authority and duty vested by AS

22.20.100

—

22.20.140

, and shall adopt the necessary regulations within the Department of Public Safety for the efficient direction, control, and discipline of the members designated by the commissioner under this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 95 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 117 SLA 1968; am § 16 ch 79 SLA 2004)

Sec. 22.20.140.
Definitions.

In AS

22.20.100

—

22.20.140

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety;

“district courts” includes sessions presided over by a magistrate;

“process” means any summons, writ, process, order, or subpoena.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1960; am § 34 ch 8 SLA 1971)